apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
    <pardef n="sem/ar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asti</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esti</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ó</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>astis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>estis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aron</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aba</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abes</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aba</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ábamos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ábemos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abais</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>abeis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aben</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ara</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>are</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aras</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ares</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ara</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>are</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áramos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>áremos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arais</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>areis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aran</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aren</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>as</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>an</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aré</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arás</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ará</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aremos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aréis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arán</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aría</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríes</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aría</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríamos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aríemos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríais</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aríeis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríen</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
        </p>

    <e><i>acesm</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aconcey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>acallent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aliment</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>allixer</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>amoyent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aneñ</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aparey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>apodrent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>argument</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>asel</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>asoley</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>avent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>baler</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>caley</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>ceb</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>complement</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>concret</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>conserv</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>cooper</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>depeñ</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>desarrey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>desenguedey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>despeñ</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>diseñ</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>emponder</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>encaden</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enfarxopet</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enllen</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enseñ</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>entr</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enxendr</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esaxer</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esfelpey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esmen</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esper</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>espey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esquer</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>estrench</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>infest</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>llend</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>nivel</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>osixen</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>pes</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>proces</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>remell</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>sed</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>sotech</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>tres</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>sem</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aconcey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aliment</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>altern</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aparey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>argument</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>atolen</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>baler</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>ceb</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>confeder</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>cooper</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>desarrey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>dexener</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>emponder</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enfarxopet</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>entel</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enxendr</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esfelpey</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esperiment</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esquer</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>estrench</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>intent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>llend</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>nivel</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>oxixen</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>pes</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>proces</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>represent</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>sed</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>sotech</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>tres</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>xel</i><par n="sem/ar__vblex"/></e>
